Nebraska, session 109, LB482.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB482 LB482
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 44-359, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-359 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in
In all cases when the beneficiary or other person entitled thereto brings
an action upon any type of insurance policy, except workers' compensation
insurance, or upon any certificate issued by a fraternal benefit society,
against any company, person, or association doing business in this state,
the court, upon rendering judgment against such company, person, or
association, shall allow the plaintiff a reasonable sum as an attorney's
fee in addition to the amount of the plaintiff's his or her recovery, to
be taxed as part of the costs. If such cause is appealed, the appellate
court shall likewise allow a reasonable sum as an attorney's fee for the
appellate proceedings, except that if the plaintiff fails to obtain
judgment for more than may have been offered by such company, person, or
association in accordance with section 25-901, then the plaintiff shall
not recover the attorney's fee provided by this section.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply when the
plaintiff's right to bring the action is based on a post-loss assignment
of rights or benefits arising out of a claim by a property owner for
damage to insured property.
Sec. 2. Original section 44-359, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-